District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.23

Mayor may enter into interstate agreement concerning enforcement of traffic laws.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia may enter into an interstate agreement with the Commonwealth of Virginia or with the State of Maryland, or with both, pursuant to which the parties to such agreement may assist each other in the enforcement of its laws relating to traffic (including parking violations).

June 30, 1972, 86 Stat. 392, Pub. L. 92-327, § 2
1981 Ed., § 40-706.
1973 Ed., § 40-603-2.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.